California statutes. Business and Professions Code
-------------------------------------------

19205.

The failure of any person to produce upon demand of an inspector any article that has been condemned and ordered held on a notice of violation signed by such person, or a notice of violation that the person has refused to sign, is a violation of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1264, Sec. 89.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

19206.

No person shall interfere with, obstruct or otherwise hinder any inspector of the bureau or of the department’s Division of Investigation in the performance of his or her duties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1264, Sec. 90.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

19207.

Any inspector having knowledge of a violation of any of the provisions of this chapter shall notify the chief of the violation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1941, Ch. 1206.)
-------------------------------------------

19208.

The chief or his or her authorized designee may cite any person licensed under and subject to the provisions of this chapter to participate in an office conference before the chief to show cause why he or she should not be subject to any or a range of disciplinary actions or to prosecution for any violation of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 405, Sec. 52.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

19209.

Except as otherwise required to comply with the provisions of Article 9.5 of this chapter, the proceedings in any hearing or disciplinary action under this chapter shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1045.)
-------------------------------------------

19210.

After a hearing, a license may be suspended, revoked, reprimanded, or placed on probation for a violation of any of the provisions of this chapter or of the rules and regulations of the bureau, or for a violation of Article 1 (commencing with Section 17500) of Chapter 1 of Part 3 of Division 7 of the Business and Professions Code, relating to false or misleading advertising; provided, however, that the license of a wholesaler or retailer shall not be suspended in the absence of a finding that the wholesaler or retailer knowingly offered for sale or sold articles not conforming to the requirements of this chapter or the rules and regulations of the bureau.

In any order of suspension or revocation, the bureau may impose conditions relative to the disposition of articles not conforming to the requirements of this chapter or the rules and regulations of the bureau, or may impose conditions relative to the completion or fulfillment of any orders or contracts entered into prior to the date of the hearing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 850, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

19211.

Any person who has been denied a license, or who has had their license revoked, or whose license is under suspension, or who has failed to renew their license while it was under suspension, or any person who has been a member of any limited liability company or of any partnership, or an officer or director of any corporation, or an officer or person acting in a managerial capacity of any firm or association, whose license has been revoked, or whose license is under suspension, or who has failed to renew a license while it was under suspension, and while acting as a member, officer, director, or person acting in a managerial capacity, participated in any of the prohibited acts for which the license was suspended, or revoked,
 shall be prohibited from serving as a member of any licensed limited liability company or of any licensed partnership, or as an officer or director of any licensed corporation, or as an officer or person acting in a managerial capacity of any licensed firm or association, and the employment, election, or association of a person in this capacity by a licensee shall constitute grounds for disciplinary action against the licensee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 508, Sec. 38.   (SB 814)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

19212.

The performance by any partnership, limited liability company, corporation, firm, or association of any act or omission constituting a cause for disciplinary action, likewise constitutes a cause for disciplinary action against any licensee who is a member of that partnership or limited liability company, or an officer or director of that corporation, or an officer or person acting in a managerial capacity of that firm or association, if the licensee participated in the prohibited act or omission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 508, Sec. 39.   (SB 814)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

19213.

The bureau may monitor compliance with all insulation standards, including those adopted by the Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission, pursuant to Section 25402 of the Public Resources Code, by conducting periodic inspections with its own personnel, or by requiring inspections conducted by an approved independent third party laboratory, of manufacturers, distributors, or retailers of insulation material sold within the state in order to determine their compliance with this article. The bureau shall annually test all categories of insulation products for which standards have been adopted. The bureau may require those manufacturers, distributors, or retailers that are inspected and found not in compliance with this article, or any regulation implementing it, to pay such reasonable fees as are necessary to cover the costs of inspections and testing necessary to investigate and enforce compliance by those manufacturers, distributors, and retailers. Fees shall be fixed in an amount not more than the cost of testing and inspection with a minimum fee of two hundred dollars ($200) for each test or inspection. The bureau may also conduct, or contract with approved independent third party laboratories to conduct, independent performance tests of insulation materials sold in the state, in order to determine compliance with its adopted standards. Where a fee is not paid, the full amount of the assessed fee shall be added to the fee for the renewal of a license. A license shall not be renewed without payment of the renewal fee and all fees for testing and inspection.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1264, Sec. 92.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

19213.1.

The bureau may require a licensee who sells or manufactures furniture and bedding products that are inspected and found not to be in compliance with this chapter, or any regulation implementing it, to pay those reasonable fees as are necessary to cover the costs of inspections and testing necessary to investigate and enforce compliance by those licenses. Fees shall be fixed in an amount not more than the cost of testing and inspection except that the minimum fee shall be two hundred dollars ($200) for each test or inspection. The range of fees for testing or inspection shall be fixed by the bureau in an amount not less than two hundred dollars ($200) and not more than five hundred dollars ($500) for each test or inspection. Where a fee is not paid, the full amount of the assessed fee shall be added to the fee for the renewal of a license. A license shall not be renewed without payment of the renewal fee and all fees for testing and inspection.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1264, Sec. 93.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

19214.

Any person who violates or proposes to violate any provision of this chapter relating to insulation standards may be enjoined by any court of competent jurisdiction. The court may make those orders or judgments, including the appointment of a receiver, as may be necessary to prevent the use or employment by any person of any practices which violate this chapter, or which may be necessary to restore to any person in interest any money or property, real or personal, which may have been acquired by means of any practice which violates any provision of this chapter.

Actions for injunction under this section may be prosecuted by the Attorney General or any district attorney, county counsel, city attorney,
 or city prosecutor in this state in the name of the people of the State of California upon their own motion or upon the complaint of any board, officer, person, corporation, association, partnership, limited liability company, or by any person acting for the interests of itself, its members, or the general public.

(a) A person who violates any provision of this chapter shall be liable for a civil penalty not to exceed two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) for each violation, which shall be assessed and recovered in a civil action brought in the name of the people of the State of California by the Attorney General or by any district attorney, county counsel, city attorney, or city prosecutor in any court of competent jurisdiction. The unit for a separate and distinct offense regarding insulation in violation of this chapter is each
 and every bag, bale, package, roll, or other container sold, offered for sale, or possessed with intent to sell or install contrary to the provisions of this chapter.

(b) If the action is brought by the Attorney General, one-half of the penalty collected shall be paid to the treasurer of the county in which the judgment was entered, and one-half to the Treasurer. If brought by a district attorney or county counsel, the entire amount of penalty collected shall be paid to the treasurer of the county in which the judgment was entered. If brought by a city attorney or city prosecutor, one-half of the penalty shall be paid to the treasurer of the county and one-half to the city.

(c) If the action is brought at the request of the bureau, the court shall determine the reasonable expenses
 incurred by the bureau in the investigation and prosecution of the action.

Before any penalty collected is paid out pursuant to subdivision (b), the amount of the reasonable expenses incurred by the bureau shall be paid to the Treasurer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 508, Sec. 40.   (SB 814)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9.5. Disciplinary Proceedings Against Nonresidents [19215. - 19215.8.]

19215.

As used in this article, unless otherwise indicated, “director” means the Director of the Office of Administrative Hearings.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

19215.1.

The acceptance by a nonresident licensee of any of the rights and privileges conferred upon him or her by this chapter, as evidenced by his or her engaging within this state, either personally or through an agent or employee, in a business subject to license under this chapter, is equivalent to the appointment by the licensee of the director as his or her true and lawful attorney upon whom may be served all lawful process in any disciplinary proceeding conducted against him or her under this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 405, Sec. 54.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

19215.2.

The acceptance of such rights and privileges as so evidenced shall signify the agreement of the licensee that any such process which is served against him or her in the manner provided in this article shall be of the same legal force and validity as if served upon him or her personally in this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 405, Sec. 55.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

19215.3.

Service shall be made by leaving a copy of the accusation, together with a notice of defense and statement to respondent as described in Section 11505 of the Government Code, with a fee of two dollars ($2) for each licensee to be served, in the hands of the director or in his or her office in Sacramento. This service shall be sufficient service on the licensee subject to compliance with Section 19215.4 of this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 405, Sec. 56.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

19215.4.

A notice of such service and a copy of the accusation, together with the notice of defense and statement to respondent, shall forthwith be sent by registered mail by the director to the licensee at his or her last known address as furnished by the bureau. Personal service of this notice, copy of the accusation, notice of defense, and statement to respondent upon the licensee wherever found outside this state shall be the equivalent of this mailing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 405, Sec. 57.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

19215.5.

Proof of compliance with Section 19215.4 shall be made in the event of service by mail by affidavit of the director or his or her authorized employee showing this service by mailing, together with the return receipt of the United States post office bearing the signature of the licensee or his or her agent. The affidavit and receipt shall be appended to the original accusation on file with the bureau. In the event of personal service outside this state, compliance may be proved by the return of any duly constituted public officer qualified to serve process in civil actions in the state or jurisdiction where the licensee is found, showing such service to have been made. This return shall be appended to the original accusation on file with the bureau.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 405, Sec. 58.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

19215.6.

The bureau, or if the proceeding has been assigned to a hearing officer of the Office of Administrative Hearings, the hearing officer, may order postponements or continuances and grant extensions of time that may be necessary to afford the licensee reasonable opportunity to defend the proceeding. In no event shall the licensee have less than 30 days after the date of mailing or delivery to him or her of the copy of the accusation in which to file a notice of defense, nor shall the notice of hearing provided for in Section 11509 of the Government Code or the notice and copy of affidavit referred to in Section 11514 of the Government Code be mailed or delivered less than 20 days prior to the date of hearing, and the time for making a request to cross-examine under Section 11514 of the Government Code shall be not less than 15 days.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 405, Sec. 59.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

19215.7.

The director shall keep a record of all process served upon him or her pursuant to this article that shall show the day and hour of service.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 405, Sec. 60.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

19215.8.

As used in this article “nonresident” means a person who is not a resident of this State at the time he or she engages in business in the State as described in Section 19215.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 405, Sec. 61.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Penalties [19220. - 19221.]

19220.

Every person who violates any of the provisions of this chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor and punishable for each offense by a fine of not less than five hundred dollars ($500) nor more than one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) or by imprisonment for not less than three nor more than six months or by both such fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1264, Sec. 94.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

19221.

The unit for a separate and distinct offense in violation of this chapter is each and every article of improperly labeled, or not labeled, upholstered furniture or bedding or filling material made, repaired, recovered, renovated, sanitized, sold, exposed or offered for sale, delivered, consigned, rented, or possessed with intent to sell contrary to the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1448, Sec. 28.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3.1. Household Movers Act [19225. - 19294.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions and Definitions [19225. - 19234.1.]

19225.

This chapter may be cited as the “Household Movers Act.”

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 421, Sec. 8.   (SB 19)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

19225.5.

For purposes of this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires, the following provisions shall apply:

(a) “Broker” means a person engaged by others in the act of arranging, for compensation, the intrastate transportation of used household goods by a motor vehicle over the highways of this state for, or on behalf of, a shipper, a consignor, or a consignee.

(b) “Bureau” refers to the Bureau of Household Goods and Services, as established in Section 9810.

(c) “Chief” refers to the chief of the bureau.

(d) “Corporation”
 includes a corporation, a company, a limited liability company, an association, and a joint stock association.

(e) “Department” refers to the Department of Consumer Affairs.

(f) “Director” refers to the Director of Consumer Affairs.

(g) “Fund” means the Household Goods and Services Fund established pursuant to Section 9870.

(h) “Household mover” includes every corporation or person, their lessees, trustee, receivers, or trustees appointed by any court whatsoever, engaged in the permitted or unpermitted transportation for compensation or hire as a business by means of a motor vehicle or motor vehicles being used in the transportation of used household goods and
 personal effects over any public highway in this state. A broker, as defined in subdivision (a), shall be considered a household mover. The Legislature intends “household mover” to have the same meaning as “household goods carrier” in former Section 5109 of the Public Utilities Code, as that section read on June 30, 2018.

(i) “Inspector” refers to an inspector either employed by, or under contract to, the bureau.

(j) “Motor vehicle” means every motor truck, tractor, or other self-propelled vehicle used for transportation of property over the public highways, other than upon fixed rails or tracks, and any trailer, semitrailer, dolly, or other vehicle drawn thereby.

(k) “Owner,” with respect to a motor vehicle used in the transportation
 of property for compensation by a household mover, means the corporation or person who is registered with the Department of Motor Vehicles as the owner of the vehicle, or who has a legal right to possession of the vehicle pursuant to a lease or rental agreement.

(l) “Person” includes an individual, a firm, or a partnership.

(m) “Public highway” includes every public street, road, or highway in this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 508, Sec. 41.   (SB 814)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

19225.7.

In construing and enforcing the provisions of this chapter relating to citations and discipline, the act, omission, or failure of any officer, agent, or employee of any person or corporation, acting within the scope of his or her official duties or employment, is the act, omission, or failure of the employing person or corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 421, Sec. 8.   (SB 19)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

19225.9.

Every power granted to or duty imposed upon the director under this chapter may be exercised or performed in the name of the director by a deputy or assistant director or by the chief, subject to conditions and limitations that the director may prescribe.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 421, Sec. 8.   (SB 19)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

19226.

The regulation of the transportation of used household goods and personal effects in a motor vehicle or motor vehicles over any public highway in this state shall be exclusively as provided in this chapter. Any provision of the Public Utilities Code in conflict with the provisions of this chapter does not apply to a household mover.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 421, Sec. 8.   (SB 19)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

19227.

The transportation of used household goods and personal effects in any truck or trailer for compensation over any public highway in this state is a highly specialized type of truck transportation. This chapter is enacted for the limited purpose of providing necessary regulation for this specialized type of truck transportation only, and is not to be construed for any purpose as a precedent for the extension of that regulation to any other type of truck transportation not presently so restricted.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 421, Sec. 8.   (SB 19)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

19228.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, and until the time the director adopts regulations implementing this chapter, powers granted to, or duties imposed on, the Public Utilities Commission pursuant to the former Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 5101) of Division 2 of the Public Utilities Code are transferred to, and may be exercised by, the director in administering this chapter.

(b) All rules, regulations, general orders, forms, and Maximum Rate Tariff 4, as most recently amended
 as of July 1, 2018, by the
 Public Utilities Commission, adopted, administered, or enforced by the Public Utilities Commission for purposes of implementing and administering the former Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 5101) of Division 2 of the Public Utilities Code, that are in effect immediately preceding July 1, 2018, shall remain in effect and shall be administered and enforced by the director, until the operative date of regulations adopted by the director to implement this chapter.

(c) Until the operative date of regulations implementing this chapter, household
 movers shall observe the rules, regulations, general orders, and Maximum Rate Tariff 4, as most recently amended as of July 1, 2018, by the Public Utilities Commission, that are administered and enforced by the director pursuant to this chapter. A violation of those rules, regulations,
 general orders, or tariff may be grounds for discipline.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 421, Sec. 8.   (SB 19)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

19229.

(a) Moneys in the fund shall be used, upon appropriation by the Legislature, by the bureau for the administration of this chapter.

(b) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, all moneys, including fines or penalties imposed under this chapter, collected pursuant to this chapter shall be deposited into the fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 508, Sec. 42.   (SB 814)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

19229.1.

(a) The use of the public highways for the transportation of used household goods and personal effects for compensation is a business affected with a public interest. It is the purpose of this chapter to do all of the following:

(1) Preserve for the public the full benefit and use of public highways consistent with the needs of commerce without unnecessary congestion or wear and tear upon those highways.

(2) Secure to the people just, reasonable, and nondiscriminatory rates for transportation by
 household movers operating upon the highways.

(3) Secure full and unrestricted flow of traffic by motor carriers over the highways that will adequately meet reasonable public demands by providing for the regulation of rates of all household movers so that adequate and dependable service by all necessary household movers is maintained and the full use of the highways is preserved to the public.

(4) Promote fair dealing and ethical conduct in the rendition of services involving or incident to the transportation of household goods and personal effects.

(b) To achieve the purposes of subdivision (a), the bureau shall do all of the following:

(1) Prioritize the timely processing of applications and hold application workshops for potential applicants around the state.

(2) Enable electronic filing of applications, reports, and fee payments.

(3) Dedicate staff to answering telephone calls, mailings, and electronic inquiries from
 household movers.

(4) Prioritize the timely processing of consumer complaints.

(5) Implement electronic case tracking of complaints and their disposition.

(6) Implement a process for appropriate and timely enforcement against illegally operating household movers, including performing staff-driven investigations and enforcement through sting operations and other forms of presence in the field.

(7) Maintain relationships with, and implement
 outreach and education programs to, local law enforcement, district attorneys, and airports, and coordinate with law enforcement agencies pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 19283.1.

(8) Meet with household mover trade associations at least annually.

(9) Implement a consolidated case tracking system that integrates each of the transportation program core functions and data collection, administrative compliance details, complaints, and investigations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 421, Sec. 8.   (SB 19)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

19229.5.

(a) All moneys in the Household Movers Fund shall be transferred to the Household Goods and Services Fund by July 1, 2026. On July 1, 2026, the Household Movers Fund shall be abolished.

(b) This section shall remain in effect only until December 31,
 2026, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 508, Sec. 43.   (SB 814)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of December 31, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

19233.

This chapter shall not be construed as a regulation of commerce with foreign nations or among the several states, except insofar as those regulations are not prohibited under the provisions of the United States Constitution and the acts of the Congress of the United States.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 421, Sec. 8.   (SB 19)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

19234.

The director, in accordance with the State Civil Service Act and Section 159.5, may appoint and fix the compensation of clerical, inspection, investigation, and auditing personnel, as well as a deputy chief, as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter. All such personnel shall perform their respective duties under the supervision and the direction of the chief.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 421, Sec. 8.   (SB 19)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

19234.1.

Protection of the public shall be the highest priority for the bureau in exercising its licensing, regulatory, and disciplinary functions under this chapter. Whenever the protection of the public is inconsistent with other interests sought to be promoted, the protection of the public shall be paramount.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 421, Sec. 8.   (SB 19)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Regulation of Household Movers [19235. - 19247.]

19235.

A household mover shall not engage in the business of transportation of used household goods and personal effects for compensation by motor vehicle over any public highway in this state, except in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, which is enacted under the power of the state to regulate the use of public highways.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 421, Sec. 8.   (SB 19)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

19236.

(a) Each household mover shall display on each vehicle operated by it an identification symbol in the form and in accordance with rules and regulations prescribed by the bureau. The identifying symbols displayed by household movers subject to the Interstate Commerce Commission Order Ex Parte No. MC-41, Identification of Motor Carrier Vehicles, November 17, 1954, effective
 January 3, 1955, shall serve in lieu of the display requirements of this section, if the identifying symbols have been recorded by the household mover with the bureau.

(b) For motor vehicles first registered in this state on or after January 1, 1985, the identifying symbol shall be displayed on both the left and right doors of the cab of the vehicle.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 421, Sec. 8.   (SB 19)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

19237.

(a) A household mover shall not engage, or attempt to engage, in the business of the transportation of used household goods and personal effects by motor vehicle over any public highway in this state, including by any means or media, advertising, soliciting, offering, arranging as a broker, or entering into an agreement regarding the transportation of used household goods and personal effects, unless both of the following are satisfied:

(1) For transportation of household goods and personal effects within this state, there is in force a permit issued by the bureau authorizing those operations. Permits issued by the Public Utilities Commission pursuant to the former Chapter 7 (commencing
 with Section 5101) of Division 2 of the Public Utilities Code, that are valid and effective on the operative date of this chapter, shall remain in effect, subject to this chapter, for a period of not more than two years after the operative date of this chapter, or until the time the bureau issues, reissues, renews, suspends, revokes, or otherwise alters or amends the permit, whichever occurs earlier.

(2) (A) For transportation of household goods and personal effects from this state to another state or from another state to this state, there is in force a valid operating authority issued by the Federal Motor Carrier Safety Administration.

(B) An applicant whose principal place of business is not in this state shall not be required to meet the residency requirements pursuant
 to Section 19239 and shall file with the bureau its designation of persons upon whom court or agency process may be served in this state that the household mover made pursuant to Part 366 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(C) If the applicant only conducts interstate household moves, the applicant shall not be required to take the examination pursuant to Section 19239 and shall file an affidavit with the bureau stating it shall not conduct any intrastate household moves in this state.

(b) A household mover that engages, or attempts to engage, in the business of the transportation of used household goods and personal effects in violation of subdivision (a) shall not enforce any security interest or bring or maintain any action in law or equity to recover any money or
 property or obtain any other relief from any consignor, consignee, or owner of household goods or personal effects in connection with an agreement to transport, or the transportation of, household goods and personal effects or any related services. A person who utilizes the services of a household mover operating in violation of subdivision (a) may bring an action in any court of competent jurisdiction in this state to recover all compensation paid to that household mover.

(c) The operation of a motor vehicle used in the business of transporting household goods and personal effects by a household mover that does not possess a valid permit or operating authority, as required by subdivision (a), constitutes a public nuisance. Any peace officer, as defined in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2 of the Penal
 Code, may remove any motor vehicle located within the territorial limits in which the officer may act, when the vehicle is found upon a highway and is being used in a manner constituting a public nuisance. At the request of the bureau, the Attorney General, or a district attorney, city attorney, or county counsel, the law enforcement agency may impound the vehicle for a period not to exceed 72 hours to enable the requesting agency to abate the public nuisance, to obtain an order from the superior court of the county in which the vehicle has been impounded to prevent the use of the motor vehicle in violation of law, and to obtain any other remedy available under law as permitted by Section 19282.

(d) Any person having possession or control of used household goods or personal effects, who knows, or through the exercise of reasonable care should
 know, that a household mover transported those household goods or personal effects in violation of subdivision (a), shall release the household goods and personal effects to the consignor or consignee, as defined in Section 19245, upon the request of the consignor or consignee. If that person fails to release the household goods and personal effects, any peace officer, as defined in subdivision (c), may take custody of the household goods and personal effects and release them to the consignor or consignee.

(e) The bureau shall identify household movers that are authorized to conduct intrastate and interstate moves in the state on its internet website.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 481, Sec. 23.   (SB 1451)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

19238.

(a) To obtain an original permit, an applicant shall submit to the bureau an application in writing, on a form containing information prescribed by the bureau, which is verified under oath, and accompanied by proof of service upon those interested parties, as required by the bureau. The bureau shall require the applicant to attest in the application to facts demonstrating that the applicant is not barred by law or court order from acting as a household mover.

(b) The
 application shall be accompanied by the fee fixed pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 421, Sec. 8.   (SB 19)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

19239.

(a) Before a permit is issued, the bureau shall require the applicant to establish ability and reasonable financial responsibility to initiate the proposed operations. The bureau shall require the applicant to establish their knowledge and ability to engage in business as a household mover by examination. The examination may be written or oral, or in the form of a demonstration of skill, or any combination of these, and any investigation of character, experience, and any tests of technical knowledge and manual skill that the bureau determines to be appropriate may be employed. In any examination, the qualification of the applicant shall be determined by an appraisal made by a member of the bureau’s staff. The criteria used by the bureau staff in making the required appraisal to determine whether the applicant has met the
 qualifications shall be established by the bureau by rule or regulation, in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. An applicant who has been determined to be unqualified may establish their qualifications through a subsequent examination, but no subsequent examination shall be taken prior to 30 days from the date when the applicant was found to be unqualified. If the staff member determines that the applicant is not qualified and denies the application, the bureau shall notify the applicant in writing. Within 30 days of service of the notice, the applicant may file a written request with the bureau for a hearing on the denial. Upon receipt of a timely filed request, the bureau shall request that the matter be set for a hearing. The hearing shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and the director shall have all the
 powers granted therein. If the staff member determines that the applicant is qualified, the bureau may issue a permit without a hearing.

(b) An applicant may qualify in one of the following ways:

(1) If an individual, they may qualify by personal examination or by examination of their responsible managing employee.

(2) If a partnership or corporation, or any other type of business organization, it may qualify by examination of the responsible managing officer, an employee who works at least 32 hours per week, or a partner of the applicant firm.

(c) If the individual qualified by examination ceases to be connected with the permitholder, the permitholder shall notify the bureau in writing within 30 days after the cessation. If notice is given, the permit
 shall remain in force a reasonable length of time in order that another representative of the applicant may be qualified before the bureau. If the permitholder fails to notify the bureau of the cessation within a 30-day period, at the end of that period the permit shall be automatically suspended.

(d) The bureau shall require each applicant for a permit as a household mover, as defined in Section 19225.5, to undergo a fingerprint-based state and national criminal history background check.

(1) The bureau shall submit to the Department of Justice fingerprint images and related information for each individual owner of an applicant, if the applicant is an individual or sole proprietorship, each partner, if the applicant is a partnership, each officer and director, if the applicant is a corporation, or each member and manager, if the applicant is a limited liability company, pursuant to subdivision (u) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code. The fingerprint images and related information shall be submitted for the purpose of obtaining information as to the existence and content of a record of state and federal convictions and arrests, and information as to the existence and content of a record of state and federal convictions and arrests for which the Department of Justice establishes that the person is free on bail or on their own recognizance, pending trial or appeal.

(2) The Department of Justice shall provide a response to the bureau pursuant to subdivision (p) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code.

(3) The bureau shall request from the Department of Justice subsequent notification service, as provided pursuant to Section 11105.2 of the Penal Code, for applicants.

(4) The Department of Justice shall charge the applicant a fee sufficient to cover the reasonable cost of processing the requests described in this subdivision.

(e) The bureau may require, as a precondition to the issuance of a permit, the procurement of a performance bond sufficient to facilitate the collection of fines, penalties, and restitution related to enforcement actions that can be taken against the applicant.

(f) The bureau may refuse to issue a permit if it is shown that an applicant or an officer, director, partner, or associate of an applicant has committed any